Tennessee, session 114, HB2073.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 3-6-301(15)(D), is amended by
deleting the language:
provided further, however, that the board, utility, district, department, agency or
entity that employs the contractor, subcontractor or other representative is not
deemed to be an employer of a lobbyist for purposes of this part
and substituting:
provided further, however, that when a department, agency, or entity of state
government employs a contractor, subcontractor, or other representative to
engage in lobbying, the department, agency, or entity is not deemed to be an
employer of a lobbyist for purposes of this part
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2073
012362
- 1 -